Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Filing Documents

271B.1-200.
Filing requirements.

Each document delivered by a domestic or foreign corporation to the Secretary of State for filing shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.2-010

to

14A.2-150

Whenever a provision of KRS Chapter 271B permits any of the terms of a plan or a filed document to be dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan or filed document, the following provisions apply:

The manner in which the facts will operate upon the terms of the plan or filed document shall be set forth in the plan or filed document;

The facts may include but are not limited to:

Any of the following that is available in a nationally recognized news or information medium either in print or electronically:

Statistical or market indices;

Market prices of any security or group of securities;

Interest rates;

Currency exchange rates; or

Similar economic or financial data;

A determination or action by any person or body, including the corporation or any other party to a plan or filed document; or

The terms of, or actions taken under, an agreement to which the corporation is a party, or any other agreement or document;

As used in this subsection:

“Filed document” means a document filed with the Secretary of State under any provision of KRS Chapter 271B except an annual report or a filing pursuant to Subtitle 15 of KRS Chapter 271B; and

“Plan” means a plan of nonprofit conversion as provided for in KRS

273.382

, conversion into an LLC as provided for in KRS

275.376

, merger, or of share exchange;

The following provisions of a plan or filed document shall not be made dependent on facts outside the plan or filed document:

The name and address of any person required in a filed document;

The registered office of any entity required in a filed document;

The registered agent of any entity required in a filed document;

The number of authorized shares and designation of each class or series of shares;

The effective date of a filed document; or

Any required statement in a filed document of the date on which the underlying transaction was approved or the manner in which that approval was given; and

If a provision of a filed document is made dependent on a fact ascertainable outside of the filed document, and that fact is not ascertainable by reference to a source described in paragraph (b)1. of this subsection or a document that is a matter of public record, or the affected shareholders have not received notice of the fact from the corporation, then the corporation shall file with the Secretary of State articles of amendment setting forth the fact promptly after the time when the fact referred to is first ascertainable or thereafter changes. Articles of amendment under this paragraph are deemed to be authorized by the authorization of the original filed document or plan to which they relate and may be filed by the corporation without further action by the board of directors or the shareholders.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 1, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 137, § 46, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, §
46, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenacted, and amended ch. 151, §
50, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Mellen, Myre and Lee, Limited Liability Companies and Registered Limited Liability Partnerships in Kentucky: A Practical Analysis, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 229 (1995).

271B.1-210.
Forms. [Repealed.]

271B.1-220.
Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates — Miscellaneous charges.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered to him for filing:

(1) Articles of incorporation $40 (2) Amendment of articles of incorporation $40 (3) Restatement of articles of incorporation $40 (4) Amended and restated articles $80 (5) Articles of merger or share exchange $50 (6) Articles of dissolution $40 (7) Articles of revocation of dissolution $15 (8) Any other document required or permitted to be filed by this chapter $15

Click to view

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 3, effective January 1, 1989; 1988, ch. 85, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 341, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 137, § 48, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, §
48, effective July 15, 2010; and repealed, reenact., and amended ch. 151, §
51, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

Similar versions of this section were created by 1988 Acts Chapter 85, Section 3, and 1988 Acts Chapter 23, Section 3, which conflict in regard to the amount of fees to be charged by Secretary of State. Pursuant to
KRS

446.250

, the fees set forth in Chapter 85 prevail as the later enactment. The remaining provisions do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The payment of the filing fee is a condition precedent for filing documents with the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State may void the filing and return a document after it has been received, stamped, and filed, if the check for payment of that fee has been dishonored.

OAG 89-94

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

271B.1-230.
Effective time and date of filing. [Repealed.]

271B.1-240.
Correcting filed documents. [Repealed.]

271B.1-250.
Filing duty of Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

271B.1-260.
Appeal from Secretary of State’s refusal to file document. [Repealed.]

271B.1-270.
Evidentiary effect of filed document. [Repealed.]

271B.1-280.
Certificate of existence. [Repealed.]

271B.1-290.
Penalty for signing false document.

A person commits an offense by signing a document knowing it is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

An offense under this section shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 10, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, § 50, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
50, effective July 15, 2010.